Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 3. State Plan

§ 35-2-340.
Preparation and submission to surgeon general; notice and hearing prerequisite to submission; publication upon approval; subsequent modifications.

The commissioner shall prepare and submit to the surgeon general a state plan which shall include the hospital and medical facilities construction program developed under W.S.

35-2-320

through

35-2-322

and which shall provide for the establishment, administration, and operation of the hospital and medical facilities construction activities in accordance with the requirements of the federal act and regulations thereunder. The commissioner shall, prior to the submission of such plan to the surgeon general, give adequate publicity to a general description of all the provisions proposed to be included therein, and hold a public hearing at which all persons or organizations with a legitimate interest in such plan may be given an opportunity to express their views. After approval of the plan by the surgeon general, the commissioner shall publish a general description of the provisions thereof in at least one (1) newspaper having general circulation in each county in the state, and shall make the plan, or a copy thereof, available upon request to all interested persons or organizations. The commissioner shall from time to time review the hospital and medical facilities construction program and submit to the surgeon general any modifications thereof which he may find necessary and may submit to the surgeon general such modifications of the state plan, not inconsistent with the requirements of the federal act, as he may deem advisable.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 10; 1957, ch. 196, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 35-107.

§ 35-2-341.
Minimum standards of maintenance.

The commissioner shall by regulation prescribe minimum standards for the maintenance and operation of hospitals and medical facilities which receive federal aid for construction under the state plan.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 11; 1957, ch. 196, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 35-108; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-2-342.
Relative need for projects to be set forth.

The state plan shall set forth the relative need for the several projects included in the construction program determined in accordance with regulations prescribed pursuant to the federal act, and provide for the construction, insofar as financial resources available therefor and for maintenance and operation make possible, in the order of such relative need.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 35-109.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statute requiring establishment of “need” as precondition to operation of hospital or other facilities for the care of sick people, 61 ALR3d 278.

§ 35-2-343.
Applications for construction projects; conformity to federal and state requirements required.

Applications for hospital and medical facility construction projects for which federal funds are requested shall be submitted to the commissioner and may be submitted by the state or any political subdivision thereof or by any public or nonprofit agency authorized to construct and operate a hospital or a medical facility. Each application for a construction project shall conform to federal and state requirements.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 13; 1957, ch. 196, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 35-110.

§ 35-2-344.
Hearing and approval of applications for construction.

The commissioner shall afford to every applicant for a construction project an opportunity for a fair hearing. If the commissioner, after affording reasonable opportunity for development and presentation of applications in the order of relative need, finds that a project application complies with the requirements of W.S.

35-2-343

and is otherwise in conformity with the state plan, he shall approve such application and shall recommend and forward it to the surgeon general.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 35-111.

§ 35-2-345.
Inspection of construction projects; payment of installment of federal funds.

From time to time the commissioner shall inspect each construction project approved by the surgeon general, and, if the inspection so warrants, the commissioner shall certify to the surgeon general that work has been performed upon the project, or purchases have been made, in accordance with the approved plans and specifications, and that payment of an installment of federal funds is due to the applicant.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 35-112.